src/pp-smj-lex.txt
! Adposition lexicon
! ===================

! First come the 3 continuation lexica, the division is based on Spiik
! and should probably be revised. Then comes the adpositions themselves.



LEXICON Pp
 +Po:0 K ;
 +Pr:0 K ;

LEXICON Postp
 +Po:0 K ;

LEXICON Prep
 +Pr:0 K ;

LEXICON DUOHKE
 +Po: DUOHKE-NE ;
 +Po+Ill:X4j K ;
 +Po:Q1 DUOHKE-OBL ; 

LEXICON DUOHKE-NE
 +Nom: K ;
 +Ess:n K ;

LEXICON DUOHKE-OBL
 +Gen: K ;
 +Acc:v K ;
 +Ine:n K ;
 +Ela:s K ;

LEXICON Adposition

birra Pp ;
rastá Pp ;
badjel Pp ;
guovddelin Pp ;
gassko Pp ;
lahka Pp ;


manep Prep ;
åvdep Prep ;

duohke DUOHKE ;
vuolle DUOHKE ;
rádje DUOHKE ;
gasska DUOHKE ;
guorra DUOHKE ;

mieddel Postp ;
miehtáj Postp ;
milta Postp ;
vuossti Postp ;
tjadá Postp ;
tjadá Prep ;
dievva Postp ;
buohta Postp ;
næjgga Postp ;
baktu Postp ;
lusi Postp ;
lun'na Postp ;
sisi Postp ;
sin'na Postp ;
sissta Postp ;
gaskan Postp ;
gasskaj Postp ;
åvdån Postp ;
åvddåj Postp ;
åvddål Postp ;
mannela Postp ;
!manen Postp ;
maññáj Postp ;
maññel Postp ;
mañen Postp ;
nali Postp ;
nan'na Postp ;
hárráj Postp ;
dáfos Postp ;
duogen Postp ;
dagi Postp ;
dagá Postp ;
dagá Postp ;
lunna Postp ;
lusá Postp ;
milta Postp ;
lussta Postp ;
dagi Postp ;
lusi Postp ;
bálldaj Postp ;
rádjáj Postp ;
sadjáj Postp ;
duohkáj Postp ;
villáj Postp ;
boaktjolij Postp ;
gáktuj Postp ;
duogen Postp ;
rájen Postp ;
niedjen Postp ;
mañen Postp ;
boaktjolin Postp ;
sieges Postp ;
duoges Postp ;
rájes Postp ;
boaktjolis Postp ;
baktu Postp ;
gaskav Postp ;
oavñela Postp ;
buohta Postp ;
miehtáj Postp ;
miehtelij Postp ;
vuolebusj Postp ;
guovddelin Postp ;
miehtelin Postp ;
mañelt Postp ;
duogev Postp ;
oarjjela Postp ;
birra Postp ;
åvddålasj Postp ;
bálldal(a) Postp ;
næjkka Postp ;
nalá Postp ;
guoktel(a) Postp ;
nanna Postp ;
sinna Postp ;
nalta Postp ;
rastá Postp ;
sissta Postp ;
nali Postp ;
sisi Postp ;
sæhkáj Postp ;
maññáj Postp ;
vuosstáj Postp ;
guovddelij Postp ;
lullelij Postp ;
vuosstij Postp ;
åvddåj Postp ;
báldan Postp ;
vuollelattjan Postp ;
åvddålattjan Postp ;
birán Postp ;
guoran Postp ;
siegen Postp ;
såggelin Postp ;
såggelin Prep ;
lullelin Postp ;
lahkusin Postp ;
åvdån Postp ;
lahka Postp ;
badjelasj Postp ;
guovddelis Postp ;
lullelis Postp ;
sissñelis Postp ;
sissñelis Prep ;
lahkusis Postp ;
vuolle Postp ;
åvdås Postp ;
vuollelis Postp ;
bajelt Postp ;
guovddelav Postp ;
guorav Postp ;
mieddel(a) Postp ;
åvddål(a) Postp ;
bálldalij Postp ;
såggelij Postp ;
lahkusij Postp ;
maññelasj Postp ;
lagábuj Postp ;
badjel Postp ;
lagámusán Postp ;
bálldalin Postp ;
lagábun Postp ;
vuolelt Postp ;
váni Prep ;
oarjjela Prep ;
birra Prep ;
åvddålasj Prep ;
bálldal(a) Prep ;
goabbelij Prep ;
goabbelin Prep ;
goabbelis Prep ;
lahka Prep ;
badjelasj Prep ;
åvddål(a) Prep ;
bálldalij Prep ;
såggelij Prep ;
lahkusij Prep ;
maññelasj Prep ;
lagábuj Prep ;
badjel Prep ;
lagámusán Prep ;
bálldalin Prep ;
lunna Postp ;
milta Postp ;
lussta Postp ;
dagi Postp ;
lusi Postp ;
bálldaj Postp ;
boaktjolij Postp ;
gáktuj Postp ;
sadjáj Postp ;
rádjáj Postp ;
duohkáj Postp ;
villáj Postp ;
duogen Postp ;
niedjen Postp ;
rájen Postp ;
mañen Postp ;
boaktjolin Postp ;
sieges Postp ;
duoges Postp ;
rájes Postp ;
boaktjolis Postp ;
baktu Postp ;
gaskav Postp ;
duogev Postp ;
dagá Postp ;
dagá Postp ;
lusá Postp ;
diehti Postp ;
nuorttalis Prep ;
nuorttalis Postp ;
duobbelis Prep ;
duobbelis Postp ;
dábbelis Prep ;
dábbelis Postp ;
dåbbelis Prep ;
dåbbelis Postp ;
oarjjelis Prep ;
oarjjelis Postp ;
vuolelt Prep ;
lagábun Prep ;
davvelis Prep ;
maññelis Prep ;
davvelis Postp ;
maññelis Postp ;
åvdebun Postp ;
bajebun Postp ;
oarjebun Postp ;
dålebun Postp ;
duoppebun Postp ;
dáppebun Postp ;
dåppebun Postp ;
davebun Postp ;
ålgobun Postp ;
åvdebun Prep ;
bajebun Prep ;
oarjebun Prep ;
dålebun Prep ;
duoppebun Prep ;
dáppebun Prep ;
dåppebun Prep ;
davebun Prep ;
ålgobun Prep ;
ålggolin Prep ;
ålggolin Postp ;
nuorttalin Prep ;
duobbelin Prep ;
dábbelin Prep ;
dåbbelin Prep ;
oarjjelin Prep ;
davvelin Prep ;
sissñelin Prep ;
maññelin Prep ;
nuorttalin Postp ;
duobbelin Postp ;
dábbelin Postp ;
dåbbelin Postp ;
oarjjelin Postp ;
davvelin Postp ;
sissñelin Postp ;
maññelin Postp ;
badjelattjan Postp ;
davvelattjan Postp ;
åvdebuttjan Postp ;
davebuttjan Postp ;
davvelattjan Prep ;
åvdebuttjan Prep ;
davebuttjan Prep ;
åvdebuj Postp ;
oarjebuj Postp ;
dáppebuj Postp ;
dåppebuj Postp ;
gáttebuj Postp ;
davebuj Postp ;
ålgobuj Postp ;
åvdebuj Prep ;
oarjebuj Prep ;
dáppebuj Prep ;
dåppebuj Prep ;
gáttebuj Prep ;
davebuj Prep ;
ålgobuj Prep ;
davebuttjaj Postp ;
davebuttjaj Prep ;
badjelis Postp ;
sissñela Prep ;
maññela Prep ;
lullela Postp ;
sissñela Postp ;
maññela Postp ;
nuorttal Postp ;
duobbel Postp ; 
dábbel Postp ;
vuollel Postp ;
nuorttala Postp ;
duobbela Postp ;
dábbela Postp ;
vuollela Postp ;
nuorttal Prep ;
duobbel Prep ; 
dábbel Prep ;
vuollel Prep ;
nuorttala Prep ;
duobbela Prep ;
dábbela Prep ;
vuollela Prep ;
davvelij Prep ;
sissñelij Prep ;
maññelij Prep ;
ålggolij Prep ;
vuollelij  Prep ;
åvddålij  Prep ;
vuollelin  Prep ;
åvddålin  Prep ;
allelij Postp ;
davvelij Postp ;
sissñelij Postp ;
maññelij Postp ;
ålggolij Postp ;
badjelij  Postp ;
vuollelij  Postp ;
åvddålij  Postp ;
badjelin  Postp ;
vuollelin  Postp ;
åvddålin  Postp ;
nuorttalij Postp ;
duobbelij Postp ;
dábbelij Postp ;
dåbbelij Postp ;
nuorttalij Prep ;
duobbelij Prep ;
dábbelij Prep ;
dåbbelij Prep ;
åvddål Prep ;
åvddåla Prep ;
åvddålattjan Prep ;
åvddålij Prep ;
åvddål Postp ;
åvddåla Postp ;
åvddålattjan Postp ;
åvddålij Postp ;
ålggola Postp ;
ålggola Prep ;
vuollelattjan Postp ;
vuollelis Postp ;
vuollelattjan Prep ;
vuollelis Prep ;
lullelij Prep ;
lullelin Prep ;
lullelis Prep ;
lullelij Postp ;
lullelin Postp ;
lullelis Postp ;
lahkusij Prep ;
lahkusij Postp ;
lahkusin Postp ;
lahkusis Postp ;
lagábuj Postp ;
lagábun Postp ;
lagábuj Prep ;
lagábun Prep ;
bálldal Prep ;
bálldala Prep ;
bálldalij Prep ;
bálldalin Prep ;
bálldal Postp ;
bálldala Postp ;
bálldalij Postp ;
bálldalin Postp ;
bajebuj Postp ;
bajelt Postp ;
bajebuj Prep ;
ålggolis Prep ;
ålggolis Postp ;
åvddålis Prep ;
åvddålis Postp ;
åvdebus Prep ; 
åvdebus Postp ; 
oarjebus Prep ; 
oarjebus Postp ;
dåppelt Prep ;
dåppelt Postp ;
sisñelt Prep ;
sisñelt Postp ;
åvdålt Postp ;
